Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) There is established the Oregon Psychiatric  Access Line program in the
Oregon Health and Science University.
(2) The Oregon Psychiatric Access Line program shall provide telephone or electronic
real-time psychiatric consultations, from 9 a.m. to 5  p.m. on all business days, to primary
care providers who care for patients with mental health disorders.
(3) Psychiatrists providing advice to primary care  providers through the Oregon Psychi-
atric Access Line program regarding prescription drug treatment options shall  be informed
by any applicable guidelines:
(a) In the Practitioner-Managed Prescription  Drug Plan adopted by the Oregon Health
Authority under ORS 414.334; or
(b) Recommended by the Pharmacy and Therapeutics Committee  established by ORS
414.353.
Passed by House February 20, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2691 (HB 2691-A) Page 1